Louisiana, session 2026, SB410.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 14:25 is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§25. Accessories after the fact
A. An accessory after the fact is any person who, after the commission of a
felony, shall harbor, conceal, or aid the offender, knowing or having reasonable
ground to believe that he has committed the felony, and with the intent that he may
avoid or escape from arrest, trial, conviction, or punishment.
B. An accessory after the fact may be tried and punished, notwithstanding the
fact that the principal felon may not have been arrested, tried, convicted, or amenable
to justice.
C. Whoever Except as provided in Subsection D of this Section, whoever
becomes an accessory after the fact shall be fined not more than five hundred dollars,
or imprisoned, with or without hard labor, for not more than five years, or both;
provided that in no case shall his punishment be greater than one-half of the
maximum provided by law for a principal offender.
D.(1) Except as provided in Paragraph (2) of this Subsection, whoever
becomes an accessory after the fact to a sex offense as defined in R.S. 15:541
shall be imprisoned in the same manner as the principal offender for not less
than one-half of the minimum sentence provided by law for a principal offender
and not more than one-half of the maximum sentence provided by law for a
principal offender.
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 410 ENROLLED
(2) Whoever becomes an accessory after the fact to a sex offense as
defined in R.S. 15:541 punishable by life imprisonment shall be imprisoned at
hard labor for not less than ten years nor more than fifty years, without benefit
of parole, probation, or suspension of sentence.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.